Utah statutes.
58-31b-309.   Continuing education.
(1)  The division in collaboration with the board may establish continuing
education requirements for each classification of nurse licensure.
(2)  The division may discriminate between classifications of licensure with
respect to continuing education requirements upon finding the continuing
education requirements are necessary to reasonably protect the public health,
safety, or welfare.
